Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 2-5-205, as


amended by Section 5, Chapter 375, O.S.L. 2022 (10A O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 2-5-205), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2-5-205. A. Any person thirteen (13) or fourteen (14)


years of age who is charged with murder in the first degree shall be


held accountable for the act as if the person were an adult;


provided, the person may be certified as a youthful offender or a


juvenile as provided by this section, unless the person is subject


to the provisions of subsection H of Section 2-5-204 of this title.


B. Any person fifteen (15), sixteen (16) or seventeen (17)


years of age who is charged with murder in the first degree shall be

Req. No. 333 Page 1


held accountable for his or her act as if the person was an adult


and shall not be subject to the provisions of the Youthful Offender


Act or the provisions of the Juvenile Code for certification as a


juvenile. The person shall have all the statutory rights and


protections of an adult accused of a crime. All proceedings shall


be as for a criminal action and the provisions of Title 22 of the


Oklahoma Statutes shall apply. A person having been convicted as an


adult pursuant to this paragraph shall be tried as an adult for


every subsequent offense.


C. Any person fifteen (15), sixteen (16) or seventeen (17)


years of age who is charged with:


1. Murder in the second degree;


2. Kidnapping or attempt thereof;


3. Manslaughter in the first degree;


4. Robbery with a dangerous weapon or a firearm or attempt


thereof;


5. Robbery in the first degree or attempt thereof;


6. Robbery committed by two or more persons;


7. Rape by instrumentation or attempt thereof;


8. Forcible sodomy;


9. Lewd acts or proposals to a child under sixteen (16) years


of age or any offense in violation of subsection A of Section 1123


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


10. Domestic abuse by strangulation;

Req. No. 333 Page 2


11. Arson in the first degree or attempt thereof; or


12. Any offense in violation of Section 652 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


13. Any offense in violation of Section 1289.17A of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes; or


14. Any offense in violation of subsection A or C of Section


1378 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


shall be held accountable for such acts as a youthful offender;


provided, the person may be certified as a juvenile or as an adult


as provided by the provisions of the Youthful Offender Act.


D. At the sole discretion of the district attorney, any person


fifteen (15), sixteen (16) or seventeen (17) years of age who is


charged with rape in the first degree or attempt thereof may be held


accountable for his or her act as if the person was an adult or as a


youthful offender. When charged as an adult, the person shall have


all the statutory rights and protections of an adult accused of a


crime. All proceedings shall be as for a criminal action and the


provisions of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall apply. A


person having been convicted as an adult pursuant to this subsection


shall be tried as an adult for every subsequent offense. When


charged as a youthful offender, the person shall be held accountable


for such acts as a youthful offender; provided, the person may be


certified as a juvenile or as an adult as provided by the Youthful


Offender Act.

Req. No. 333 Page 3


E. Any person sixteen (16) or seventeen (17) years of age who


is charged with:


1. Burglary in the first degree or attempted burglary in the


first degree;


2. Battery or assault and battery on a state employee or


contractor while in the custody or supervision of the Office of


Juvenile Affairs;


3. Aggravated assault and battery of a police officer;


4. Intimidating a witness;


5. Trafficking in or manufacturing illegal drugs;


6. Assault and battery with a deadly weapon;


7. Maiming;


8. Residential burglary in the second degree after two or more


adjudications that are separated in time for delinquency for


committing burglary in the first degree or residential burglary in


the second degree;


9. Rape in the second degree; or


10. Use of a firearm while in commission of a felony,


may be held accountable for such acts as a youthful offender;


provided, the person may be certified as a juvenile or as an adult


as provided by the Youthful Offender Act.


F. 1. For any charges listed in Sections A, C, D, or E of this


section, the district attorney may elect to file a petition alleging


the person to be delinquent or may file an information charging the

Req. No. 333 Page 4


person as a youthful offender. The district attorney shall


immediately notify the Office of Juvenile Affairs upon the filing of


any youthful offender charges.


2. After an information has been filed charging a person as a


youthful offender under Sections A, C, D, or E of this section, or


as an adult under subsection B of this section, the district


attorney may elect to amend or dismiss the information and refile


any or all charges in a delinquent petition.


3. Upon the filing of an information, the person’s complete


juvenile record shall be made available to the district attorney and


the person’s attorney.


G. 1. Upon the filing of an information against a person, a


warrant shall be issued which shall set forth the rights of the


accused, and the rights of the parents, guardian, or next friend of


the accused to be present at the preliminary hearing and to have an


attorney.


2. The warrant shall be personally served together with a


certified copy of the information on the accused and on a custodial


parent, guardian, or next friend of the accused. The court may


inquire of the accused as to the whereabouts of his or her parents,


guardian, or next friend in order to avoid unnecessary delay in the


proceedings.


3. When personal service of a custodial parent, guardian, or


next friend of the accused cannot be completed, service may be made

Req. No. 333 Page 5


by certified mail to the person’s last-known address, requesting a


return receipt from the addressee only. If delivery is refused,


notice may be given by mailing a copy of the accused’s warrant


information by regular first-class mail to the address where the


person to be notified refused delivery of the notice sent by


certified mail. Where the address of a custodial parent, guardian


or next friend is not known, or if the mailed copy of the accused’s


warrant and information is returned for any reason other than


refusal of the addressee to accept delivery, after a thorough search


of all reasonably available sources to ascertain the whereabouts of


a custodial parent, guardian, or next friend has been conducted, the


court may order that notice of the hearing be given by publication


one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. The


court may also order other means of service of notice that the court


deems advisable or in the interests of justice.


4. Before service by publication is ordered, the court shall


conduct an inquiry to determine whether a thorough search has been


made of all reasonably available sources to ascertain the


whereabouts of any person for whom notice by publication is sought.


5. The person is presumed to be a youthful offender, and the


proceedings shall continue under such presumption unless the court


grants the person’s motion for certification as a juvenile pursuant


to Section 6 2-5-206A of this act title or grants the district



Req. No. 333 Page 6


attorney’s motion for imposition of an adult sentence pursuant to


Section 7 2-5-207A of this act title.


H. The court shall commence the preliminary hearing within


ninety (90) days of the filing of the information, pursuant to


Section 258 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to determine


whether a crime was committed and if there is probable cause to


believe the accused committed the crime. The requirement for the


preliminary hearing to be held within ninety (90) days may be waived


by the accused.


1. For a person charged under subsection A or B of Section 2-5-


205 of this title, if the preliminary hearing is not commenced


within ninety (90) days of the filing date of the information, the


district court shall hold a hearing to determine the reasons for


delay utilizing the procedure set out in Section 812.2 of Title 22


of the Oklahoma Statutes, to ensure the preliminary hearing is


expedited, unless the ninety-day requirement has been waived by the


accused.


2. For a person charged under subsection C, D, or E of Section


2-5-205 of this title, if the preliminary hearing is not commenced


within ninety (90) days of the filing of the information, the


district attorney shall be prohibited from seeking an adult sentence


unless the ninety-day requirement has been waived by the accused.


3. For an accused person charged under subsection A, B, C, D,


or E of Section 2-5-205 of this title, if the whereabouts of the

Req. No. 333 Page 7


accused are unknown at the time of the filing of the information or


if the accused is a fugitive, the State of Oklahoma shall make


reasonable efforts to locate the accused in order to commence the


proceedings. An accused who flees the jurisdiction of the court or


purposely avoids apprehension for the charges, waives the right to


have the preliminary hearing commenced within ninety (90) days of


the filing of the information. If the preliminary hearing does not


commence within ninety (90) days from the filing of the information


due to the absence or inability to locate the accused, the


preliminary hearing shall commence within ninety (90) days after the


state has actual notice of the in-state location of the accused. If


the accused is found out of state, the court shall set the hearing


within ninety (90) days after the accused has been returned to the


State of Oklahoma. An accused who fails to cooperate with providing


information in locating his or her parent, guardian, or next friend


for purposes of notice waives the right to have the preliminary


hearing commence within ninety (90) days of the filing of the


information.


I. At the conclusion of the state’s case at the preliminary


hearing, if the accused has filed a motion for certification as a


juvenile pursuant to subsection A of this section, or if the


district attorney has filed a motion for the imposition of an adult


sentence pursuant to Section 7 2-5-207A of this act title, both the



Req. No. 333 Page 8


accused and the district attorney may offer evidence in support or


in opposition of the pending motion or motions.


J. The court shall rule on any properly filed motion for


certification as a juvenile or motion for the imposition of an adult


sentence before ruling on whether to bind the accused over for


trial.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-333 TEK 1/16/2025 3:42:09 PM































Req. No. 333 Page 9